incubator/apertium-ovd.ovd.dix
<pardef n="kall__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e> <!--not used?-->
  <e>       <p><l>emes</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>er</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>är</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umes</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e> <!--not used?-->
  <e>       <p><l>umes</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ą</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="morgun__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="er/i__n" c="final short i due to short root syllable er">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>      <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>      <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>      <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="brind/e__n" c="final long e due to long root syllable brind">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="si/u__n">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>      <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>      <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aus__n" c="long root vowel">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tjy/r__n">
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>      <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>mm</l>      <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="luv__n" c="does this inflect?">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Adjectives:
ind/def

agree with noun in gender/number/case

advs often based on adj.sg.nt.ind (like nor)
-->
<!-- TODO adjectives (anything assigned to these is probably wrong): -->
<pardef n="wait__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="strai/ð__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ðer</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ðera</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ðest</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Numbers

gender/case

-->
<!-- TODO numbers (anything assigned to these is probably wrong): -->
<pardef n="t/wer__num">
  <e>       <p><l>wer</l>          <r>wer<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ųo</l>          <r>wer<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>war</l>          <r>wer<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>au</l>          <r>wer<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<e lm="twer"> <i>t</i> <par n="t/wer__num"/></e>
<e lm="morgun"> <i>morgun</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapp"> <i>kapp</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="dal"> <i>dal</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="kamb"> <i>kamb</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="stien"> <i>stien</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="nytjyl"> <i>nytjyl</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="kripp" c="unge"> <i>kripp</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="wind"> <i>wind</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="miða" c="søppel"> <i>miða</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="kall"> <i>kall</i> <par n="kall__n"/></e>
<e lm="övkall"> <i>övkall</i> <par n="kall__n"/></e>
<e lm="smið"> <i>smið</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="fistj" c="fisk"> <i>fistj</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="röv" c="rev"> <i>röv</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="diel" c="del"> <i>diel</i> <par n="morgun__n"/></e>
<e lm="siu"> <i>si</i> <par n="si/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="eri" c="hare"> <i>er</i> <par n="er/i__n"/></e>
<e lm="brinde" c="elg"> <i>brind</i> <par n="brind/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="öve"> <i>öv</i> <par n="brind/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="tjyr"> <i>tjy</i> <par n="tjy/r__n"/></e>
<e lm="aus" c="hus"> <i>aus</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="iett" c="jern"> <i>iett</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="ienn" c="jern"> <i>ienn</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="bien" c="bein"> <i>bien</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="mål"> <i>mål</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="får" c="sau"> <i>får</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="wattn"> <i>wattn</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="buord"> <i>buord</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="oga" c="auga"> <i>oga</i> <par n="aus__n"/></e>
<e lm="luv" c="lov/løyve"> <i>luv</i> <par n="luv__n"/></e>
<e lm="kold"> <i>kold</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stur"> <i>stur</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wait"> <i>wait</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gåmål"> <i>gåmål</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="liuot"> <i>liuot</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gåmål" c="19"> <i>gåmål</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="diuop"> <i>diuop</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="liuos"> <i>liuos</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fesiktug"> <i>fesiktug</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blå"> <i>blå</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ungrug"> <i>ungrug</i> <par n="wait__adj"/></e>
<e lm="straið"> <i>strai</i> <par n="strai/ð__adj"/></e>
